Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1721.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 443.16. Medical Assistance Coverage for Peer Recovery Support Services.--(a) Peer recovery support services are compensable under the medical assistance program in accordance with the Commonwealth's approved State plan for individuals with a mental health disorder or substance use disorder through a licensed provider or through a certified peer recovery support services provider . Peer recovery support services are reimbursable as a primary service for individuals with a mild, moderate or severe mental health disorder or 12345678910111213141516171819 substance use disorder and as a primary service for family members of a covered medical assistance beneficiary and require no other diagnosis, condition or preauthorization.(b) Peer recovery support services delivered by a provider shall be deemed eligible for reimbursement under subsection (a) if supervised by a licensed mental health practitioner, which shall include an appropriately trained and credentialed peer support specialist supervisor.(c) The department and the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs shall promulgate regulations as necessary to implement this section. The department and the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs shall ensure that the regulations promulgated under this subsection comply with all of the following criteria:(1) The regulations may not interrupt the provision of care to recipients enrolled in the medical assistance program.(2) The regulations shall provide a reasonable amount of time for an existing provider participating in the medical assistance program on the effective date of this paragraph to comply with the provisions of this section while continuing to participate in the medical assistance program.(3) The regulations may not require a peer recovery support services provider to seek certification as a certified peer recovery support services provider if the provider does not seek reimbursement through the medical assistance program.(4) The regulations shall provide a reasonable mechanism for the establishment of medical necessity for a recipient of peer recovery support services by a certified peer recovery support services provider that authorizes the provider to contract directly with an external licensed mental health practitioner for a proposed recipient assessment and referral.20250HB1721PN2121 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) The regulations shall provide for the certification of a peer recovery support services provider by the department or the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs that provides peer recovery support services to individuals, family members and loved ones for mental health, substance use or both mental health and substance use. The regulations shall include all the following requirements for a peer recovery support services provider applying for certification by the department or the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs: (i) The applicant shall be a nonclinical provider that employs peer recovery support specialists to provide peer recovery support services.(ii) The applicant shall employ peer support specialist supervisors and provide at least weekly peer support specialist supervision to each employed peer recovery support specialist.(iii) The applicant shall annually attest under penalty of perjury that the applicant is governed by a nonprofit board of directors comprised of at least 51% membership from individuals, family members or loved ones with a lived or living experience involving a mental health or substance use disorder.(iv) The applicant shall have policies and procedures to ensure compliance in providing support for all pathways and programs of individual recovery, including harm reduction, abstinence and medication use.(6) The department shall supervise and facilitate the c ertification of a peer recovery support services provider for mental health.(7) The Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs shall supervise and facilitate the certification of a peer recovery support services provider for substance use.20250HB1721PN2121 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) The department and the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs shall supervise and facilitate the certification of a peer recovery support services provider for both mental health and substance use through a joint certification by the department and the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs.(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impede, disallow or modify the conditions of an existing clinically or medically licensed provider on the effective date of this subsection that is authorized to provide peer recovery support services to recipients in the medical assistance program.(e) The following words and phrases when used in this section shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Certified peer recovery support services provider." An independent, nonclinical, nonprofit organization as specified under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.) that meets all of the following criteria:(1) Is appropriately credentialed by the department or the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs.(2) Is led and governed by individuals in mental health and substance use recovery.(3) Employs peer recovery support specialists and peer support specialist supervisors.(4) Provides peer recovery support services."Mental health disorder." A concern characterized by a significant disturbance in an individual's cognition, emotional regulation or behavior that reflects a dysfunction in the psychological, biological or development processes underlying mental functioning.20250HB1721PN2121 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Peer recovery support services." A form of nonprofessional, nonclinical assistance provided by a peer recovery support specialist that is delivered in-person, via video or telephone or virtually, to an individual, family member or loved one as a means to support the recovery from a mental health or substance use disorder, including a direct one-on-one engagement or direct group engagement with a maximum of ten individuals per peer recovery support specialist."Peer recovery support specialist." An individual who has a personal lived or living experience involving a mental health or substance use disorder, including with a family member or loved one, and who has been trained and certified in this Commonwealth by an approved training and certifying body."Peer support specialist supervisor." An individual who has a personal lived or living experience involving a mental health or substance use disorder, including with a family member or loved one, and who has been trained and certified in this Commonwealth by an approved training and certifying body with a valid peer support specialist supervisor credential of any type. The term does not include an individual with an active clinical or medical license."Substance use disorder." A pattern of use of alcohol or other drugs leading to clinical or functional impairment.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB1721PN2121 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324